src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! # Pronoun inflection

!! Erzya pronouns inflect in many the same cases as regular
!! nouns.


!! ## Closed class personal pronouns
! ------------------------------
LEXICON PRONOUN-TYPES
 PERS ;
! INTERR ;
 REL/INTERR_PRONOUNS ;
 INDEFINITE-PRON ;
! NEG-PRON ;
 COLL-PRON ;
 PRON-DEM ;

кие+Pron:ки PRON-INTERR-HUM_KIE ;

!та-кода K ; ! XXX already pron
кие+Pron:ки PRON-IS-REL-PERS ;

эрьва+Det:Ӓ3рьва NMN_KUDO ;
эрьвата+Det:Ӓ3рьвата NMN_KUDO ;
эте+Det:эте DET-DEM_TE ;
тете+Pron:тете DET-DEM_TE ;

! ============================= !
!  Person morphological lexica !
! ============================= !

!LEXICON PRON-PERS_
!+Pers: K ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL_
!+Refl: K ;
LEXICON PRON-IS-REFL-PRL-PXSG1
+Refl+Prl+PxSg1: K ;
LEXICON PRON-IS-REFL-PRL-PXSG2
+Refl+Prl+PxSg2: K ;
LEXICON PRON-IS-REFL-PRL-PXSG3
+Refl+Prl+PxSg3: K ;
LEXICON PRON-IS-REFL-PRL-PXPL1
+Refl+Prl+PxPl1: K ;
LEXICON PRON-IS-REFL-PRL-PXPL2
+Refl+Prl+PxPl2: K ;
LEXICON PRON-IS-REFL-PRL-PXPL3
+Refl+Prl+PxPl3: K ;


!LEXICON PRON-PERS-DAT
!+Pers+Dat: POSSX4-END-DAT ;

!LEXICON Dat-NoArg
!Pron+Pers+Dat: POSSX4-END-DAT ;

!LEXICON Ill-Pron
!+Pers+Ill: OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-HUM_KIE !!Interr-Pers
+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom:е ENDLEX ; !!= @CODE@ кие:ки
+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom: ENDLEX ; 
+Sem/Hum+Pl+Nom:%>т%{ЬØ%} ENDLEX ; 
+Sem/Hum: PRON-INTERR-HUM_KIE-OBL ;
+Sem/Hum+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg1:%>ян K ;
+Sem/Hum+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg2:%>ят K ;
+Sem/Hum+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg3:е K ;
+Sem/Hum+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl1:%>тяно K ;
+Sem/Hum+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl2:%>тядо K ;
+Sem/Hum+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScPl3:%>ть K ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-HUM_KIE-OBL
+Abe:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 ENDLEX ;
+Abl:%>%{дт%}О1 ENDLEX ;
+Dat:%>нень ENDLEX ;
+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+Gen:%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Ill:%>с ENDLEX ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE
+Sem/Obj: PossPX1-NomSg ;
+Sem/Obj: PossPX1 ;
+Sem/Obj: PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE-OBL ;
+Sem/Obj: CLT/COP_SG ; !!= @CODE@ singular

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE-OBL
+Abe:%>вт{оеэ%}мО1 ENDLEX ;
+Com:%>шка ENDLEX ;
+Dat:%>нень ENDLEX ;
+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+Gen:%>нь ENDLEX ;
+Ill:%>с ENDLEX ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} ENDLEX ;
+Prl:%>ва ENDLEX ;
+Tra:%>кс ENDLEX ;

!LEXICON PRON-INDEF_
!+Indef: K ;

!LEXICON PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE_IS-PL-NOM-INDEF
!+Pl+Nom+Indef: ENDLEX ;

!LEXICON PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE_IS-SG-NOM-DEF
!+Sg+Nom+Def: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ADV-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE_IS-TRA
+Adv+Tra:%>кс ENDLEX ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1 !! мон:мо
+Abe:нтемень K ;
+Abl:ндень K ;
+Cmpr:ншкан K ;
+Dat+Long:нень K ;
+Ela:ньстэнь K ;
+Gen:нь K ;
+Ill:ньзэнь K ;
+Ine:ньсэнь K ;
+Nom:н K ;
+Prl:ньган K ;
+Tra:ньксэнь K ;
+Gen:н N2Dem-SE ;

!@P.PossPx.Sg1@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.1@:@P.PossPx.Sg1@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.1@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Abl+NoPoss:нде K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Refl+Abe+NoPoss:нстеме K ;
!+Pron+Dem:нете _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2 !! тон:то
+Abe:нтеметь K ;
+Abl:ндеть K ;
+Cmpr:ншкат K ;
+Dat+Long:неть K ;
+Ela:ньстэть K ;
+Gen:нь K ;
+Gen:нть K ;
+Ill:ньзэть K ;
+Ine:ньсэть K ;
+Nom:н K ;
+Prl:ньгат K ;
+Tra:ньксэть K ;
+Gen:н N2Dem-SE ;

!@P.PossPx.Sg2@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.2@:@P.PossPx.Sg2@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.2@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Pers+Sg2+Abl+NoPoss:нде K ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Dial+Pers+Sg2+Refl+Abe+NoPoss:нстеме K ;
!+Pers+Sg2+Pron+Dem:нете _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3 !! сон:со
+Abe:нтемензэ K ;
+Abl:ндензэ K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Abl:ндедензэ K ;
+Cmpr:ньшканзо K ;
+Dat+Long:нензэ K ;
+Ela:ньстэнзэ K ;
+Gen:нзэ GEN-PERS-PRON-MWN_OR_PRED_OR_K ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Gen:нзо K ;
+Ill:ньзэнзэ K ;
+Ine:ньсэнзэ K ;
+Nom:н K ;
+Prl:ньганзо K ;
+Tra:ньксэнзэ K ;
+Gen:нзэ N2Dem-SE ;

+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Gen+Der/MWN+Sg+Abl+Def:ндензэнть K ; !сонзэденть

!@P.PossPx.Sg3@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.3@:@P.PossPx.Sg3@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.3@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;

LEXICON GEN-PERS-PRON-MWN_OR_PRED_OR_K
+Der/MWN+Pron: _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ;
 OBL-WITH-COP_KAL ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1 !! минь:
+Abe:нтеменек K ;
+Abl:нденек K ;
+Cmpr:ньшканок K ;
+Dat+Long:ненек K ;
+Ela:ньстэнек K ;
+Gen:нек GEN-PERS-PRON-MWN_OR_PRED_OR_K ;
+Ill:ньзэнек K ;
+Ine:ньсэнек K ;
+Nom:нь K ;
+Prl:ньганок K ;
+Tra:ньксэнек K ;
!@P.PossPx.Pl1@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.1@:@P.PossPx.Pl1@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.1@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
+Gen:нек N2Dem-SE ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2 !! тынь:ты
+Abe:нтеменк K ;
+Abl:нденк K ;
+Cmpr:ньшканк K ;
+Dat+Long:ненк K ;
+Ela:ньстэнк K ;
+Gen:нк GEN-PERS-PRON-MWN_OR_PRED_OR_K ;
+Ill:ньзэнк K ;
+Ine:ньсэнк K ;
+Nom:нь K ;
+Prl:ньганк K ;
+Tra:ньксэнк K ;
+Gen:нк N2Dem-SE ;

!@P.PossPx.Pl2@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.2@:@P.PossPx.Pl2@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.2@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3 !! сынь:сы
+Abe:нтемест K ;
+Abl:ндест K ;
+Cmpr:ньшкаст K ;
+Dat+Long:нест K ;
+Dat+Long:ненст K ;
+Ela:ньстэст K ;
+Gen:нст GEN-PERS-PRON-MWN_OR_PRED_OR_K ;
+Ill:ньзэст K ;
+Ine:ньсэст K ;
+Nom:нь K ;
+Prl:ньгаст K ;
+Tra:ньксэст K ;
+Gen:нст N2Dem-SE ;

!@P.PossPx.Pl3@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.3@:@P.PossPx.Pl3@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.3@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!LEXICON IS_PRON-PERS-PL3-DAT !!= * @CODE@ сыненст
!+Pers+Pl3+Dat: K ;
!LEXICON PRON-REFL_E2S1 !!= @CODE@ !!эсь:эсь
!+Refl: PersPron_Minsy-Obliq ;
!+Refl+Adn: ENDLEX ;
!+Refl+Prl:%>ка PossPX1 ; 
!+Refl+Prl+Prl:%>кава PossPX1 ; 

!LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2_IS-INTENSIVE
!+Pers+Pl2+Refl+Nom: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT
+Der+Der/MWN+N: _KUDO-N2-Def-Declension ; !эсестэнть, эсестэкс 2022-03-26
 GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
+Der/MWN+Pron: NMN_DEF_PL_DECLENSION ;
LEXICON GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT
 K ;
 GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION ;

LEXICON PERS
мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1:мо PRON-PERS-SG1 ;
тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2:то  PRON-PERS-SG2 ;
сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3:со  PRON-PERS-SG3 ;
мон+Pron+Pers+Pl1:ми PRON-PERS-PL1 ;
тон+Pron+Pers+Pl2:ты PRON-PERS-PL2 ;
сон+Pron+Pers+Pl3:сы PRON-PERS-PL3 ;
монсь+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Gen+Long:монсень GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
монсь+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Gen+Long:минсенек 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
тонсь+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen+Long:тонсеть 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
тонсь+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Gen+Long:тынсенк 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
сонсь+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Gen+Long:сонсензэ 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
сонсь+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Gen+Long:сынсест 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
монсь+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Gen+Short:Ӓ3сень GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
монсь+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Gen+Short:Ӓ3сенек 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
тонсь+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen+Short:Ӓ3сеть 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
тонсь+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Gen+Short:Ӓ3сенк 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
сонсь+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Gen+Short:Ӓ3сензэ 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
сонсь+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Gen+Short:Ӓ3сест 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
монсь+Pron+Use/NG+Dial+Refl+Sg1+Gen+Short:Ӓ3синь GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
монсь+Pron+Use/NG+Dial+Refl+Pl1+Gen+Short:Ӓ3синек 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
тонсь+Pron+Use/NG+Dial+Refl+Sg2+Gen+Short:Ӓ3сить 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
тонсь+Pron+Use/NG+Dial+Refl+Pl2+Gen+Short:Ӓ3синк 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
сонсь+Pron+Use/NG+Dial+Refl+Sg3+Gen+Short:Ӓ3синзэ 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
сонсь+Pron+Use/NG+Dial+Refl+Pl3+Gen+Short:Ӓ3сист 2-6_GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
